Maryland, session 2025, HB1219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONSTRUCTION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(3) “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1219*

HOUSE BILL 1219
(4) “GENERATING STATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A GENERATING STATION THAT:
(1) INCLUDES THE CO–LOCATION OF A DATA CENTER WITH THE
STATION; AND
(2) DOES NOT INTERCONNECT WITH THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION
SYSTEM OR ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
SPECIFIC POLICIES RELATED TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF A GENERATING STATION
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(1) DEFINE A GENERATING STATION AS AN INDEPENDENT RESOURCE
NOT SUBJECT TO STATE LAWS AND REGULATIONS RELATED TO RETAIL ELECTRIC
CUSTOMERS OR ELECTRICITY SUPPLIERS;
(2) CLARIFY THAT STATE–MANDATED ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM FEES OR RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD OBLIGATIONS DO
NOT APPLY TO THE GENERATING STATION OR ENERGY GENERATED AT THE
GENERATING STATION;
(3) ENSURE THAT A GENERATING STATION INCLUDES BACKUP
SOURCES OF ELECTRICITY FOR RELIABILITY, INCLUDING ON–SITE GENERATING
CAPACITY;
(4) DEVELOP ROBUST PROTECTIVE MEASURES TO ENSURE THAT A
GENERATING STATION DOES NOT INTERACT WITH THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION
SYSTEM OR ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM;
(5) REQUIRE A GENERATING STATION TO INCLUDE CYBERSECURITY
SAFEGUARDS;
(6) ENSURE THAT AN APPLICANT FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A GENERATING
STATION DEMONSTRATE DURING THE APPLICATION PROCESS THAT THE
GENERATING STATION SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1219 3
(I) BE AN INDEPENDENT RESOURCE THAT WILL NOT BE
INTERCONNECTED WITH THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM OR ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM;
(II) COMPLY WITH ALL RELEVANT STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS;
AND
(III) CONTRIBUTE TO THE STATE’S ENERGY GOALS; AND
(7) REQUIRE A PERSON THAT OWNS OR OPERATES A GENERATING
STATION TO SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE COMMISSION THAT INCLUDES
INFORMATION REGARDING:
(I) THE SOURCE AND AMOUNT OF ENERGY USED AT THE
GENERATING STATION;
(II) THE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT OF THE GENERATING
STATION;
(III) THE GENERATING STATION’S CONTRIBUTIONS TO STATE
ENERGY GOALS THROUGH ENERGY EFFICIENCY OR EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS; AND
(IV) COMPLIANCE WITH OPERATIONAL STANDARDS FOR THE
GENERATING STATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.